Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202650-1817
Inspector General; investigation of complaints; priority and selection.

The Office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act does not require the Inspector General to investigate all complaints. The Inspector General, with input from the Director of Legislative Oversight, shall prioritize and select investigations and inquiries that further the intent of the act and assist in legislative oversight of the Nebraska child welfare system and juvenile justice system. If the Inspector General determines that the office will not investigate a complaint, the Inspector General may recommend to the parties alternative means of resolution of the issues in the complaint.

Laws 2012, LB821, § 37;

Laws 2015, LB347, § 22;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 43-4330;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 40.